Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 70
CONSERVATION DISTRICTS

Section

35-70-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Soil Conservation Act".

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1170, § 2.

CSA:

C. 149A, § 2.

L. 41:

p. 688, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-2.

35-70-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that the state of Colorado, through wind and water erosion and depletion of subsurface water resources, has lost for agricultural and livestock uses approximately six million acres, or one-tenth of the total area of the state; that these losses range from severe damage to complete destruction of the topsoils of these areas; that these losses have been caused by improper farm and range practices, by increasing the rate of withdrawal from underground water reserves without adequate attention to recharging such reserves, and by failure to conserve to the full the precious rainfall and snowpacks that could help replenish underground water reserves, and that the areas of land thus destroyed will increase until and unless a constructive method of land use providing for the conservation and preservation of natural resources, including adequate underground water reserves, the control of wind and water erosion, and the reduction of damage resulting from floods, is established by law over the entire state. It is to accomplish this purpose and to insure the health, prosperity, and welfare of the state of Colorado and its people that this article is created, and it shall be construed liberally in order that the purposes expressed in this article may be accomplished.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1169, § 1.

CSA:

C. 149A, § 1.

L. 41:

p. 688, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-1.

L. 55:

p. 847, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-1.

35-70-102.5. Legislative declaration - change of name - continuity of existence.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Upon creation in this article, the name "soil conservation district" best reflected the activities of such districts throughout this state;

To better reflect the current activities of the soil conservation districts in this state, each such district should be referred to as a "conservation district"; and

The name of the state board governing all such districts should accordingly be changed from the "soil conservation board" to the "conservation board".

On and after July 1, 2002, the conservation board shall execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested in the soil conservation board prior to July 1, 2002, and all employees of the soil conservation board shall be transferred to the conservation board and shall become employees thereof. Such employees shall retain all rights to the state personnel system and retirement benefits under the laws of this state, and their services shall be deemed to have been continuous. All transfers and any abolishment of positions in the state personnel system shall be made and processed in accordance with state personnel system laws and rules and regulations.

On July 1, 2002, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the soil conservation board are transferred to the conservation board and shall become the property thereof.

Whenever the soil conservation board is referred to or designated by any contract or other document, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the conservation board. All contracts entered into by the soil conservation board prior to July 1, 2002, are hereby validated, with the conservation board succeeding to all the rights and obligations of such contracts. Any appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years open to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts are hereby transferred and appropriated to the conservation board for the payment of such obligations.

Each soil conservation district duly organized pursuant to this article prior to July 1, 2002, is hereby recognized as a duly organized conservation district, and its existence shall be deemed to have been continuous. Whenever a soil conservation district is referred to or designated by any contract or other document, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the conservation district. All contracts entered into by such soil conservation district prior to July 1, 2002, are hereby validated, with the conservation district succeeding to all the rights and obligations of such contracts.

On and after July 1, 2002, when any provision of the Colorado Revised Statutes refers to the soil conservation board or to a soil conservation district, said law shall be construed as referring to the conservation board or to a conservation district, respectively. The revisor of statutes is authorized to change all references in the Colorado Revised Statutes to the soil conservation board and to soil conservation districts to refer to the conservation board and conservation districts.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 512, § 1, effective July 1.

35-70-103. State conservation board - composition - powers.

There is created in the department of agriculture the state conservation board, referred to in this article 70 as the "state board", which consists of nine members. The state board is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105. One member of the state board must be a qualified elector of the state appointed by the governor from the state at large. The remaining eight positions on the state board shall be filled by elections held within the areas described in this section. The boards of supervisors of local conservation districts within each such area shall elect the number of members specified in this subsection (1). An election must be held between November 1 and December 31 of the year preceding the commencement of a new term for each position. A candidate must be or have been an elected supervisor of a local conservation district. The number of members to be elected and the areas from which they are to be elected are as follows:

The White-Yampa and North Platte river watersheds, one member;

The San Juan basin, one member;

The Arkansas river watershed, two members, one from the upper Arkansas river watershed and one member from the lower Arkansas river watershed;

The Rio Grande watershed, one member;

The Republican and South Platte river watersheds, two members, one from the upper South Platte river watershed and one member from the Republican river and lower South Platte river watersheds;

The Colorado, Gunnison, and Dolores river watersheds, one member.

The state board created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall, on and after July 1, 2000, execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested in the former state board in the department of natural resources. On July 1, 2000, all employees of the former state board whose principal duties are concerned with the duties and functions transferred to the state board created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) and whose employment in the former state board is deemed necessary by the commissioner of agriculture to carry out the purposes of this article shall be transferred to the state board created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) and shall become employees thereof. Such employees shall retain all rights to the state personnel system and retirement benefits under the laws of this state, and their services shall be deemed to have been continuous. All transfers and any abolishment of positions in the state personnel system shall be made and processed in accordance with state personnel system laws and rules.

On July 1, 2000, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the former state board in the department of natural resources pertaining to the duties and functions transferred to the state board in the department of agriculture shall become the property of the state board created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

All contracts entered into by the former state board prior to July 1, 2000, in connection with the duties and functions transferred to the state board, created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), are hereby validated. Any appropriations of moneys for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2000, and from prior fiscal years open to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts are hereby transferred and appropriated to the state board created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) for the payment of such obligations.

All rules, regulations, rates, orders, agreements, and awards of the state board lawfully adopted prior to July 1, 2000, shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

All elected and appointed members shall hold office for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year. The term of an elected member commences on January 1 following the member's election.

Any vacancies occurring in the elective positions on the state board shall be filled by the board by the appointment of a person who would be qualified to stand for election for the board and who is from the same area in which the vacancy occurred, and such appointee shall hold office until the expiration of the term of the office to which he was appointed.

The director of extension work, the director of the state experiment station, the commissioner of agriculture, and the executive director of the department of natural resources shall serve in an advisory capacity to the state board at its request.

Members of the state board shall serve without pay except for their actual traveling and living expenses while on official business of the state board.

The state board has the following powers and duties:

To promote and assist in the organization of conservation districts in any section of the state where erosion damage exists or is threatened;

To accept petitions for the organization of conservation districts and to examine such petitions, determine their sufficiency, and find whether, in its judgment, the organization of such districts is required for the preservation of the health, prosperity, and welfare of the state of Colorado and its people. If, in the opinion of the state board, it is for the best interests of the state that such districts be organized, it shall proceed to hold a hearing and call an election of the landowners within such proposed district, as provided in section 35-70-105.

To prepare and present to the qualified voters uniform bylaws for the conduct of the business of such districts; but, before such bylaws become effective as to any district, they shall first be approved by the qualified voters within each district. Any bylaws so presented and approved shall be consistent with all the provisions of this article.

To act in an advisory capacity with the board of supervisors of each district and to coordinate the programs of all conservation districts;

To act as the state board of appeals;

To prepare a uniform and adequate system of accounting for districts, which may be adopted and used by all districts within the state;

To administer and disburse any funds that may be made available to the state board for the purpose of assisting conservation districts in the conservation of soil and water resources of the state of Colorado and to defray expenses of the state board and its duly appointed or employed agents in carrying out the provisions of this article;

To loan money to conservation districts to assist such districts in furthering the purposes of this article, such loans to be in such amounts and for such terms as the state board may prescribe by rule in order to fully protect the funds and interest of the state board.

In addition to the powers and duties granted to the state board in other sections of this article, the board has the following powers and duties:

To undertake studies of watershed planning and to undertake development of watershed flood prevention and underground water storage projects, both on its own initiative and in response to requests submitted to the board by one or more soil or water conservation districts, flood prevention or control districts, boards of county commissioners, municipalities, drainage or irrigation districts, or other legally constituted bodies having authority under state law to carry out, maintain, and operate the works of improvement;

To hold public hearings at any point within or without each proposed watershed for the purpose of determining the extent of public interest, the degree of anticipated cooperation, and any other data and information needed by the state board in making decisions as to each project;

To plan, in cooperation with the United States government or any of its agencies, the state of Colorado or any of its political subdivisions, and private individuals or corporations, conservation districts, and others, watershed improvement, underground water storage and flood prevention projects, conservation and erosion control practices, and other projects not inconsistent with this article;

Within the limits of available funds, to administer, direct, and operate such watershed improvement, underground water storage and flood prevention projects, conservation and erosion control projects, and other similar activities;

To administer and expend funds made available to the state board by the United States government or any of its agencies or by the state of Colorado or any of its political subdivisions or funds derived from any other source for the purpose of planning, developing, and putting into operation practices and projects undertaken in accordance with this subsection (6);

To obtain options upon and to acquire, or acquire control of, by purchase, exchange, lease, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any property, real or personal, or rights or interests therein; to maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired, to receive income from such properties, and to expend such income in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this article; and to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its property or interests therein in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this article;

To erect suitable structures and maintain any facilities, so as to arrest or prevent the erosion of soils or lands, to improve the watershed and prevent floods, and to increase underground water reserves, with due consideration to established water rights;

To accept grants, services, and materials and to borrow money from the United States or from any corporation or agency created or designed by the United States to lend or grant money, or from the state of Colorado or any of its subdivisions, or from any other source; but in no event shall the state board pledge the faith or credit of the state of Colorado or any county or other political subdivision. In connection with such grants or loans, it may enter into such agreements or contracts as may be required for such purposes.

To report annually at such times and on such matters as the commissioner of agriculture may require. Publications circulated in quantity outside the executive branch are subject to the approval and control of the commissioner of agriculture.

To place any funds it receives pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subsection (6) into a trust and to administer and expend any moneys in such trust.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1170, § 3.

CSA:

C. 149A, § 3.

L. 41:

p. 689, § 1.

L. 45:

p. 624, § 1.

L. 49:

p. 663, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-3.

L. 55:

p. 848, § 2.

L. 59:

p. 709, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-3.

L. 64:

p. 172, § 140.

L. 73:

p. 1353, § 1.

L. 77:

(5)(e) amended, p. 289, § 68, effective June 29.

L. 82:

(1)(c) and (1)(e) amended and (6)(j) added, p. 527, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 2000:

(1) and (6)(i) amended, p. 558, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1)(a), (5)(a), (5)(d), (5)(g), (5)(h), and (6)(c) amended, pp. 515, 519, §§ 8, 17, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1040), ch. 47, p. 123, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 80, § 108, effective February 25; IP(1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3404, § 153, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) and subsection IP(1)(a) by SB 22-013 and SB 22-162 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-70-104. Petition for organization of district - qualified electors.

Proceedings to determine whether or not a conservation district shall be organized shall be instituted by a petition addressed to the state board and signed by not less than twenty-five percent of the owners of land within the district and who own not less than half of the area to be included within the proposed district. A determination after hearing by the state board that the requisite number of landowners have signed such petition and that such petition has been signed by landowners who own not less than half of the area to be included within the proposed district shall be final and conclusive unless objection is made to the sufficiency of such petition and appeal is taken from the determination of the board.

The petition shall include:

The name of the proposed district;

Two maps or plats showing the boundaries of the proposed district;

Narrative statement giving the legal description of the area to be included within the proposed district by legal subdivisions or by metes and bounds;

Brief statements of the character of the lands within the boundaries of the proposed district and the need for the establishment of such district.

Every person who is a qualified elector of this state and who owns land within the proposed or existing district is entitled to vote at any election of a proposed or existing district on any matter concerning the organization, operation, consolidation, or dissolution of such district.

A "qualified voter" or "qualified elector", as referred to in this article, means any registered voter or corporation owning land within the proposed or existing district, as shown by the records in the office of the appropriate county clerk and recorder, and any heir or devisee of such land of a deceased landowner.
(4) (a) (I) A "qualified voter" or "qualified elector", as referred to in this article, means any registered voter or corporation owning land within the proposed or existing district, as shown by the records in the office of the appropriate county clerk and recorder, and any heir or devisee of such land of a deceased landowner.

A landowner who is a qualified voter or qualified elector as defined in this paragraph (a) may authorize a family member who is a registered voter and a renter or manager of the land to vote in an election on behalf of such landowner.

Authorization pursuant to this subparagraph (II) shall be made prior to every election of the district.

A corporation owning land within a proposed or existing district is entitled to vote if such corporation duly authorizes an agent to vote in the election in its behalf.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1171, § 4.

CSA:

C. 149A, § 4.

L. 41:

p. 689, § 1.

L. 45:

p. 624, § 2.

L. 49:

p. 665, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-4.

L. 73:

p. 1354, § 2.

L. 82:

Entire section R&RE, p. 528, § 3, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 306, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 519, § 18, effective July 1.

35-70-104.1. Mobile home ownership - elections and petitions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 70 to the contrary, for all elections and petitions that require ownership of real property or land, the ownership of a mobile home as defined in section 5-1-301 (29) or 38-12-201.5 (5), or a manufactured home as defined in section 42-1-102 (48.8), is sufficient to qualify as ownership of real property or land for the purpose of voting rights and petitions.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 546, § 7, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 706, § 11, effective April 19; entire section amended, p. 2567, § 82, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 1276, § 44, effective June 5.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 927, § 19, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2984, § 81, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 94-092 and Senate Bill 94-001 were harmonized.

35-70-105. Hearing on petition - election.

Within sixty days after it receives a petition, the state board shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the petition. Such notice shall state:

That a petition has been filed for the organization of a conservation district and the name of the proposed district;

The date (not less than twenty days from the date of such notice), hour, and place that a hearing will be had to determine the sufficiency of the petition and the necessity and advisability of the formation of the proposed district;

That said petition, map, or plat of the proposed district and related material are on file and may be seen and examined by any interested person at the office of the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the proposed district is located and the office of the state board or other designated place within the period between the date of the notice and the date of the hearing;

That anytime after the filing of the petition for the organization of a conservation district, but no later than five days before the day fixed for the hearing thereon, the owner of any real property within the proposed district may file a petition with the state board stating reasons why said property should not be included therein and requesting that said real property be excluded therefrom. Such petition shall be duly verified and shall describe the property sought to be excluded. The state board shall hear said petition and all objections thereto at the time of the hearing on the petition for organization and shall determine whether, in the best public interest, said property should be excluded or included in the proposed district.

If on hearing, in the opinion of the state board, the petition or map or plat is insufficient, the papers shall be returned to the petitioners for amendment. If, in the opinion of the state board, the organization of the district is not required for the preservation of the health, prosperity, and welfare of the state of Colorado and its people, it shall so advise the petitioners, and the district shall not be organized, but subsequent petitions covering the same or substantially the same territory may be filed after six months have expired from the date of denial of any such petition, and new hearings shall be held and determinations made thereon.

If it appears upon hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed district territory outside of the area within which due notice has been given or to exclude territory within the district as proposed by the petition, the state board shall determine and define by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions the boundaries of the proposed district, making such inclusions and exclusions as may be determined desirable. The proposal to include territory within which due notice has not been given shall be considered only at an adjourned hearing to be held after due notice thereof has been given throughout the entire area considered for inclusion in the district and such adjourned hearing held.

If, following the hearing, it is the opinion of the state board that the petition and accompanying map or plat are sufficient and it appears that the organization of the proposed district is feasible and practicable and is required for the preservation of the health, prosperity, and welfare of the state of Colorado and its people, the state board shall make and record such determination.

If it is determined that the petition and the map or plat are sufficient and the proposed district is necessary, the state board shall call an election. The state board shall select the date, time, and place for the holding of the election, such date to be not less than twenty days nor more than forty days from the time the state board's determination becomes final.

The state board shall give notice by publication of the date, time, and place of such election, together with a statement of the matters which will be considered at the election. This notice shall also describe the outer boundaries of the proposed district and any exclusions of land within such boundaries, state that the qualifications of voters shall be as described in section 35-70-104 (3), state that the petition is on file at the office of the county clerk and recorder, and state the procedures for nominating supervisors and the place where absent voters' ballots can be obtained. Such publication shall be made not less than ten days nor more than thirty days before the date of such election.

At such election the qualified voter shall vote for or against the organization of the conservation district.

The state board shall conduct the proceedings of the election provided for in this subsection (5) and shall be the judge of all matters in connection therewith. It has the authority to appoint one or more of its own members or other proper persons to act for it and in its stead in such matters. After the organizational election, all subsequent elections and administrative actions concerning the operation of the district, except as otherwise provided in this article, shall be conducted as provided in the local district's bylaws.

If the canvass of votes at any organization election discloses that one-half or more of the votes cast are against organization of the district, the result of the election shall be recorded in the minutes of the state board, and the proposal shall be dismissed. If the canvass discloses that more than one-half of the votes cast are for the organization of the district, the result shall be recorded in the minutes of the state board, and the board shall proceed as provided in section 35-70-106.

The candidates, according to the number of supervisors to be elected, receiving the most votes cast shall be elected. The supervisors elected shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101 and, if required by the state or local board, file a bond in the same manner as specified in section 32-1-901. Failure to take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101 or to furnish a bond, if required, except for good cause shown, shall create a vacancy in the office, and the vacancy shall be filled by the next candidate receiving the highest number of votes in the case of a new district or by the remaining supervisors as specified in section 35-70-107 (4).

For the purposes of this section, "publication" means printing, once a week for two consecutive weeks, by two publications in one newspaper of general circulation in the proposed conservation district if there is such a newspaper, and, if not, then in a newspaper in the county in which the proposed conservation district is located. It is not necessary that publication be made on the same day of each week.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this article, the state board and each local district board of supervisors in the conduct of all elections shall follow, as much as practicable, the election procedures set forth in part 8 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S.

Whenever reference is made to the secretary or board of a special district, it shall be deemed to mean the secretary or board of supervisors of the local district or state board, as applicable.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1172, § 5.

CSA:

C. 149A, § 5.

L. 41:

p. 691, § 1.

L. 45:

p. 627, § 3.

L. 49:

p. 667, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-5.

L. 55:

p. 849, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-5.

L. 65:

p. 1058, § 1.

L. 82:

(1) and (5) to (7) R&RE, p. 528, § 4, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 95:

(7)(a) amended, p. 1108, § 52, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(7)(a) amended, p. 1476, § 39, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(a), (1)(d), (5)(c), and (6) amended, p. 520, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(5)(e)(II) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 700, § 32, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

35-70-106. Creation of district - certification.

Within sixty days after the holding of such election, if more than a majority of the votes cast are for organization of such proposed district, the state board shall certify to the division of local government in the department of local affairs a statement of such election and the result thereof, together with a map or plat showing the area included within such district. The director of said division shall thereupon execute and deliver to the state board a certificate declaring the area within the boundaries of such district to be a lawful conservation district under its name as shown in the records, and thereafter such district shall be a public body corporate and a political subdivision of the state of Colorado and shall have all the powers and duties imposed upon such districts under the provisions of this article. Because the district is a political subdivision of the state, the property of such district, both real and personal, shall be exempt from taxation pursuant to section 4 of article X of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1176, § 6.

CSA:

C. 149A, § 6.

L. 41:

p. 694, § 1.

L. 49:

p. 672, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-6.

L. 73:

p. 1354, § 3.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 604, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 530, § 5, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 520, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 826, § 1, effective May 14.

35-70-107. Board of supervisors - election - term.

The governing body of the district shall consist of a board of supervisors, referred to in this article as "supervisors", who shall be elected by the qualified electors of the district at an election conducted as provided in section 35-70-105. Each board shall consist of not less than five and not more than eleven supervisors, which number shall be specified in the bylaws of the district.
(1) (a) (I) The governing body of the district shall consist of a board of supervisors, referred to in this article as "supervisors", who shall be elected by the qualified electors of the district at an election conducted as provided in section 35-70-105. Each board shall consist of not less than five and not more than eleven supervisors, which number shall be specified in the bylaws of the district.

At least sixty-six percent of the supervisors of each district shall be agricultural producers who are landowners in the district; except that, if the district cannot find the requisite percentage of agricultural producers, the district may petition the state board for an exemption from the percentage requirement.

Each supervisor shall serve for a term of four years; except that each district's board shall provide for the staggering of supervisorial terms so that the terms of no more than a simple majority of supervisors expire at any one time. Supervisors serving on July 1, 1995, shall continue to serve the terms for which they were elected or appointed.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), no one shall be eligible to become a candidate for election as a member of the board of supervisors of any such district unless such person is a landowner in and a qualified elector of the district, including a renter or manager of the landowner's land pursuant to section 35-70-104 (4), or the duly authorized representative of a corporation owning lands within the district.

The business of the district shall be transacted by the supervisors as provided in this article and in the district's bylaws. All special and regular meetings of the board of supervisors shall be held at locations which are within the boundaries of the district or which are within the boundaries of any county in which the district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the meeting location does not exceed twenty miles from the district boundaries. The provisions of this subsection (2) governing the location of meetings may be waived only if the following criteria are met:

The proposed change of location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the board; and

A resolution is adopted by the board stating the reason for which a meeting of the board is to be held in a location other than under the provisions of this subsection (2) and further stating the date, time, and place of such meeting.

Members of the board of supervisors shall be entitled to travel and other expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties, such reimbursement to be payable only from the income of the district. No supervisor shall be personally liable for the consequences of his official acts; nor shall he receive, by virtue of his office, any benefits from the conduct of the affairs of the district other than the benefits any landowner may be entitled to receive from the operation of the district.

If a vacancy occurs on the board of supervisors, the remaining supervisors shall appoint a successor for the remainder of the term of the seat vacated. In the event any supervisor ceases to be a qualified voter of and landowner in the district or the corporation which he represents ceases to be an owner of lands within the district, the supervisors shall thereupon declare a vacancy and proceed to appoint a successor.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1177, § 7.

CSA:

C. 149A, § 7.

L. 41:

p. 695, § 1.

L. 49:

p. 672, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-7.

L. 82:

Entire section R&RE, p. 530, § 6, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 84:

(1)(a) amended, p. 948, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1500, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 306, § 2, effective July 1.